Hawaii, session 2026, SB3022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Aloha order of merit was established to recognize individuals who have made significant contributions and achieved national or international recognition in a field either by a single event or by a totality of work that has been pioneering in that field or outstanding in the long term. The legislature also finds that many exceptional and notable individuals are deserving of recognition specifically for their contributions to the State.  While the Aloha order of merit honors individuals who have made national and international contributions and achieved recognition, the legislature believes there should be a similar program to honor individuals who have made their mark on the State. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish the Hawaii leadership awards program to honor individuals who have made considerable and outstanding contributions to the State in their respective fields and serve as inspirations to others. SECTION 2. Chapter 9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§9-     Hawaii leadership awards program.  (a) There is established within the state archives for administrative purposes the Hawaii leadership awards program to honor individuals who: (1)  Have made considerable and outstanding contributions to the State; and (2)  Serve as an inspiration to others. (b)  Awards shall be presented annually to individuals in each of the following categories: (1)  Arts; (2)  Business and labor; (3)  Entertainment; (4)  Food and drink; (5)  Literature; (6)  Music; (7)  Sports; (8)  Science; (9)  Community engagement; (10)  Public service; (11)  Friend of Hawaii; and (12)  Profile in courage; who have resided in the State for a period of at least seven years; provided that no individual receiving an award pursuant to paragraph (11) shall reside in the State. (c)  The governor, lieutenant governor, and members of the Hawaii leadership awards selection committee, or their designees, shall present the awards to awardees annually.  No individual shall receive more than one award per year. (d)  Each awardee shall: (1)  Receive a certificate of honor and medal; and (2)  Have the awardee's story and a statement of recognition displayed in a conspicuous place for a period of one year; provided that after the year, the awardee's information shall be added to a permanent archival exhibit of awardees, to include those from the Aloha order of merit; provided further that the awardee's information shall be archived within the state archives. (e)  Awardees shall be selected by a Hawaii leadership awards selection committee who shall ensure visibility and fair and equitable consideration for all nominees in its evaluation and selection process.  The selection committee shall be composed of the following members: (1)  One individual appointed by the president of the senate; (2)  One individual appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; (3)  One individual appointed by the governor; (4)  One individual appointed by the lieutenant governor; and (5)  One individual from the state archives. (f)  Nominations for awardees shall be accepted by the Hawaii leadership awards selection committee from the public. (g) The state archives shall coordinate with respective stakeholders to administer and execute the program." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.